Maryland, session 2025, HB0065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–410 through 7–421 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–411 through 7–422, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
7–410.
(A) THE GOVERNOR ANNUALLY SHALL PROCLAIM MAY 8 AS COMMUNITY
HEALTH WORKER APPRECIATION DAY.
(B) THE PROCLAMATION SHALL URGE EDUCATIONAL AND CULTURAL
ORGANIZATIONS TO OBSERVE COMMUNITY HEALTH WORKERS WITH INFORMATIVE
PROGRAMS AND ACTIVITIES.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.